Georgia, session 2025_26, HB895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 6 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Georgia
Legislative Retirement System, is amended in Code Section 47-6-80, relating to eligibility
and application for a retirement allowance, early retirement, monthly retirement allowance,
amount of retirement allowance, compliance with federal tax laws, and increases in
retirement allowance, by revising subsection (c.1) and by adding a new subsection to read
as follows:
"(c.1) In lieu of the monthly service retirement allowance provided in subsection (c.2)
or (d) of this Code section, for any person who was a contributing member on January 1,
2022, or who first becomes a contributing member after January 1, 2022, upon retirement
H. B. 895
- 1 -

LC 56 0408
under subsection (a) of this Code section such member shall receive a monthly service
retirement allowance equal to the sum of $50.00 for each year of such member's creditable
service and an additional $200.00 for each year of such member's presiding creditable
service. Any inactive or retired member who was not a contributing member on January 1,
2022, and who becomes a contributing member again after January 1, 2022, shall be
eligible for the monthly service retirement allowance provided in this subsection for his or
her membership service earned after January 1, 2022.
(c.2) In lieu of the monthly service retirement allowance provided in subsection (c.1) or (d)
of this Code section, for any person who was a contributing member on January 1, 2026,
or who first becomes a contributing member after January 1, 2026, upon retirement under
subsection (a) of this Code section such member shall receive a monthly service retirement
allowance equal to the sum of $75.00 for each year of such member's creditable service and
an additional $300.00 for each year of such member's presiding creditable service. Any
inactive or retired member who was not a contributing member on January 1, 2026, and
who becomes a contributing member again after January 1, 2026, shall be eligible for the
monthly service retirement allowance provided in this subsection for his or her membership
service earned after January 1, 2026."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 895
- 2 -